Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.2405, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Capitol event fees; appropriation. The commissioner may collect charges or fees from users holding events in the Capitol building. Money collected by the commissioner under this subdivision shall be deposited in a Capitol events dedicated account in the special revenue fund. Money in the dedicated account is appropriated to the commissioner of administration to recover direct costs incurred from holding events in the Capitol building. deleted text begin The commissioner shall report annually by September 15 on the events held in the Capitol building, the amounts collected for those events, and the costs for operating events, to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees in the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over finance and policy relating to the commissioner of administration.deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16C.08, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Reports. deleted text begin (a) The commissioner shall submit to the governor, the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives Ways and Means and senate Finance Committees, and the Legislative Reference Library a yearly listing of all contracts for professional or technical services executed. The report must identify the contractor, contract amount, duration, and services to be provided. The commissioner shall also issue yearly reports summarizing the contract review activities of the department by fiscal year. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) The fiscal year report must be submitted by September 1 of each year and must: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) be sorted by agency and by contractor; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) show the aggregate value of contracts issued by each agency and issued to each contractor; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) distinguish between contracts that are being issued for the first time and contracts that are being extended; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) state the termination date of each contract; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) identify services by commodity code, including topics such as contracts for training, contracts for research and opinions, and contracts for computer systems; and deleted text end deleted text begin (6) identify which contracts were awarded without following the solicitation process in this chapter because it was determined that there was only a single source for the services. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end Within 30 days of final completion of a contract over $25,000 covered by this subdivision, the head of the agency entering into the contract must submit a report to the commissioner who must make the report publicly available online and submit a copy to the Legislative Reference Library. The report must: (1) summarize the purpose of the contract, including why it was necessary to enter into a contract; (2) state the amount spent on the contract; (3) if the contract was awarded without following the solicitation process in this chapter because it was determined that there was only a single source for the services, explain why the agency determined there was only a single source for the services; and (4) include a written performance evaluation of the work done under the contract. The evaluation must include an appraisal of the contractor's timeliness, quality, cost, and overall performance in meeting the terms and objectives of the contract. Contractors may request copies of evaluations prepared under this subdivision and may respond in writing. Contractor responses must be maintained with the contract file. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.665, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section and section 138.666, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Historic and archaeological properties" means properties designated in sections 138.662 and 138.664 or listed on the National Register of Historic Places. new text end new text begin (c) "Memorandum of understanding" means an agreement reached by the state, state departments, state agencies, and political subdivisions, including the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, on a suitable course of action to avoid, minimize, or mitigate any adverse effects to designated or listed properties. new text end new text begin (d) "National Register of Historic Places" has the meaning given in Public Law 89-665. The National Register of Historic Places is the official list of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in American history, architecture, archaeology, engineering, and culture. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.665, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Consultation. The state, state departments, agencies, and political subdivisions, including the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, have a responsibility to protect the physical features and historic character of properties designated in sections 138.662 and 138.664 or listed on the National Register of Historic Places deleted text begin created by Public Law 89-665deleted text end . Before carrying out any undertaking that will affect designated or listed properties, or funding or licensing an undertaking by other parties, the new text begin responsible new text end state department deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end agencynew text begin , or political subdivision, including the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota,new text end shall consult with the State Historic Preservation Office pursuant to the State Historic Preservation Office's established procedures to determine appropriate treatments and to seek ways to avoid deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin , minimize, ornew text end mitigate any adverse effects on designated or listed properties. If the deleted text begin state department or agency and thedeleted text end State Historic Preservation Office deleted text begin agreedeleted text end new text begin agreesnew text end in writing deleted text begin on a suitable course of actiondeleted text end new text begin that the undertaking will have no adverse effects on the designated or listed propertynew text end , the project may proceed. new text begin If there are adverse effects, a reasonable and good faith effort must be made to avoid, minimize, or mitigate adverse effects to the designated or listed property, and a memorandum of understanding must be completed among the parties. new text end If the parties cannot agree, any one of the parties may request that the governor appoint and convene a mediation task force consisting of five members, two appointed by the governor, the chair of the State Review Board of the State Historic Preservation Office, the commissioner of administration or the commissioner's designee, and one member appointed by the director of the Minnesota Historical Society. The two appointees of the governor and of the director of the society shall be qualified by training or experience in one or more of the following disciplines: (1) history; (2) archaeology; and (3) architectural history. The mediation task force is not subject to the conditions of section 15.059. This subdivision does not apply to section 138.662, subdivision 24, and section 138.664, subdivisions 8 and 111. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 138.666, is amended to read: 138.666 COOPERATION. The state, state departments and agencies, new text begin and new text end political subdivisions, deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin includingnew text end the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesotanew text begin ,new text end shall cooperate with the Minnesota Historical Society and the State Historic Preservation Office in safeguarding state historic sites and in the preservation of historic and archaeological properties. Sec. 6. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16C.155, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06089 16C.155 JANITORIAL CONTRACTS; REHABILITATION PROGRAMS AND EXTENDED EMPLOYMENT PROVIDERS. Subd. 3. Contract tracking and annual report. The commissioner shall track, by the commodity code for each service area identified in subdivision 1, each contract entered into pursuant to this section. By February 15 of each year, the commissioner shall submit the following information for the previous fiscal year to the chairs and ranking members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over workforce development: (1) the value of the contracts awarded to eligible service providers for each of the applicable commodity codes; and (2) the total value for all contracts awarded in each of the service areas identified in subdivision 1.